Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.070

Fees.

The department shall charge fees for issuance, renewal, and reinstatement of certificates of registration; and changes of name, address, or business structure. The department shall set the fees by rule.

The entire amount of the fees are to be used solely to cover the full cost of issuing certificates, filing papers and notices, and administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall include reproduction, travel, per diem, and administrative and legal support costs.

[ 1997 c 314 s 7; 1983 c 74 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 66 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 153 s 5; 1967 c 126 s 2; 1963 c 77 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 66: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 66 s 2.]